Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.027, subdivision 20, is amended to read: Subd. 20. Hunting licenses to critically ill persons. The commissioner may allow critically ill persons to purchase, once in a lifetime, hunting licenses otherwise limited by a lottery drawing, which licenses allow for taking game within established hunting seasons or season frameworks. The commissioner may provide the licenses to persons who are participating in a program for critically ill hunters sponsored by a nonprofit organization with expertise in providing hunting opportunities to hunters who are gravely ill or have physical disabilities. The commissioner may provide licenses or permits otherwise limited by drawings, including wild turkey, deer, bear, new text begin and new text end prairie chickendeleted text begin , and wolfdeleted text end . The commissioner may not allow the purchase of moose and elk licenses under this subdivision. Deer licenses authorized by the commissioner under this subdivision may be for deer of either sex. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 97A.075, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Wolf deleted text begin licenses;deleted text end new text begin management and monitoringnew text end account established. deleted text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "wolf license" means a license or permit issued under section 97A.475, subdivision 2, clause (21); 3, paragraph (a), clause (17); or 20, paragraph (b). deleted text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end A wolf management and monitoring account is created in the game and fish fund. deleted text begin Revenue from wolf licenses must be credited todeleted text end new text begin Money innew text end the wolf management and monitoring account and is appropriated to the commissioner only for wolf management, research, damage control, enforcement, and education. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, money credited to the account may not be used to pay indirect costs or agency shared services. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.451, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Residents and nonresidents under age 16; small game. (a) A resident or nonresident under age 16 may not obtain a small-game license but may take small game by firearms or bow and arrow without a license if the resident or nonresident is: (1) age 14 or 15 and possesses a firearms safety certificate; (2) age 13, possesses a firearms safety certificate, and is accompanied by a parent or guardian; (3) age 13, 14, or 15, and possesses an apprentice-hunter validation as provided under section 97B.022; or (4) age 12 or under and is accompanied by a parent or guardian. (b) A resident under age 16 may take small gamedeleted text begin , other than wolves,deleted text end by trapping without a small-game license, but a resident 13 years of age or older must have a trapping license. A resident under age 13 may trap small gamedeleted text begin , other than wolves,deleted text end without a trapping license, but may not register fisher, otter, bobcat, or pine marten unless the resident is at least age five. Any fisher, otter, bobcat, or pine marten taken by a resident under age five must be included in the limit of the accompanying parent or guardian. (c) A resident or nonresident under age 13 must obtain a free turkey license to take turkey and may take a turkey without a firearms safety certificate if the resident or nonresident is accompanied by an adult parent or guardian who has a firearms safety certificate. (d) A resident under age 13 may apply for a prairie-chicken license and may take a prairie chicken without a firearms safety certificate if the resident is accompanied by an adult parent or guardian who has a firearms safety certificate. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.473, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Lifetime small-game-hunting license; fee. (a) A resident lifetime small-game-hunting license authorizes a person to hunt and trap small gamedeleted text begin , other than wolves,deleted text end in the state. The license authorizes those hunting and trapping activities authorized by the annual resident small-game-hunting license and the trapping license for fur-bearing animals deleted text begin other than wolvesdeleted text end . The license does not include any hunting stamps required by law. (b) The fees for a resident lifetime small-game-hunting license are: (1) age 3 and under, $223; (2) age 4 to age 15, $301; (3) age 16 to age 50, $430; and (4) age 51 and over, $274. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.473, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Lifetime sporting license; fee. (a) A resident lifetime sporting license authorizes a person to take fish by angling and hunt and trap small gamedeleted text begin , other than wolves,deleted text end in the state. The license authorizes those activities authorized by the annual resident angling and resident small-game-hunting licenses and the resident trapping license for fur-bearing animals deleted text begin other than wolvesdeleted text end . The license does not include a trout-and-salmon stamp validation, a walleye stamp validation, or any other stamps required by law. (b) The fees for a resident lifetime sporting license are: (1) age 3 and under, $522; (2) age 4 to age 15, $710; (3) age 16 to age 50, $927; and (4) age 51 and over, $603. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.473, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Lifetime sporting with spearing option license; fee. (a) A resident lifetime sporting with spearing option license authorizes a person to take fish by angling or spearing and hunt and trap small gamedeleted text begin , other than wolves,deleted text end in the state. The license authorizes those activities authorized by the annual resident angling, spearing, and resident small-game-hunting licenses and the resident trapping license deleted text begin for fur-bearing animals other than wolvesdeleted text end . The license does not include a trout-and-salmon stamp validation, a walleye stamp validation, or any other stamps required by law. (b) The fees for a resident lifetime sporting with spearing option license are: (1) age 3 and under, $612; (2) age 4 to age 15, $833; (3) age 16 to age 50, $1,046; and (4) age 51 and over, $666. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 97A.475, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Resident hunting. Fees for the following licenses, to be issued to residents only, are: (1) for persons age 18 or over and under age 65 to take small game, $15.50; (2) for persons age 65 or over, $7 to take small game; (3) for persons age 18 or over to take turkey, $26; (4) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take turkey, $5; (5) for persons age 18 or over to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season, $34; (6) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by archery, $34; (7) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, $34; (8) to take moose, for a party of not more than six persons, $356; (9) for persons age 18 or over to take bear, $44; (10) to take elk, for a party of not more than two persons, $287; (11) to take light geese during the light goose conservation order, $2.50; (12) to take sandhill crane during the sandhill crane season, $3; (13) to take prairie chickens, $23; (14) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season, $5; (15) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer by archery, $5; (16) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, $5; (17) for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take bear, no fee; (18) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take bear, $5; (19) for persons age 18 or over to take small game for a consecutive 72-hour period selected by the licensee, $19, of which an amount equal to one-half of the fee for the migratory-waterfowl stamp under subdivision 5, clause (1), shall be deposited in the waterfowl habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 2; one-half of the fee for the pheasant stamp under subdivision 5, clause (2), shall be deposited in the pheasant habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 4; and one-half of the small-game surcharge under subdivision 4, shall be deposited in the wildlife acquisition account; (20) for persons age 16 or over and under age 18 to take small game, $5; deleted text begin (21) to take wolf, $30; deleted text end deleted text begin (22)deleted text end new text begin (21)new text end for persons age 12 and under to take turkey, no fee; deleted text begin (23)deleted text end new text begin (22)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by firearm, no fee; deleted text begin (24)deleted text end new text begin (23)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by archery, no fee; deleted text begin (25)deleted text end new text begin (24)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, no fee; and deleted text begin (26)deleted text end new text begin (25)new text end for disabled veterans to take deer or small game under section 97A.465, subdivision 9, $5. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Nonresident hunting. (a) Fees for the following licenses, to be issued to nonresidents, are: (1) for persons age 18 or over to take small game, $90.50; (2) for persons age 18 or over to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season, $180; (3) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by archery, $180; (4) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, $180; (5) for persons age 18 or over to take bear, $225; (6) for persons age 18 or over to take turkey, $91; (7) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take turkey, $5; (8) to take raccoon or bobcat, $178; (9) to take light geese during the light goose conservation order, $2.50; (10) to take sandhill crane during the sandhill crane season, $3; (11) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season in any open season option or time period, $5; (12) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer by archery, $5; (13) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer during the muzzleloader season, $5; (14) for persons age 13 or over and under 18 to take bear, $5; (15) for persons age 18 or over to take small game for a consecutive 72-hour period selected by the licensee, $75, of which an amount equal to one-half of the fee for the migratory-waterfowl stamp under subdivision 5, clause (1), shall be deposited in the waterfowl habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 2; one-half of the fee for the pheasant stamp under subdivision 5, clause (2), shall be deposited in the pheasant habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 4; and one-half of the small-game surcharge under subdivision 4, shall be deposited into the wildlife acquisition account; (16) for persons age 16 or 17 to take small game, $5; deleted text begin (17) to take wolf, $250; deleted text end deleted text begin (18)deleted text end new text begin (17)new text end for persons age 12 and under to take turkey, no fee; deleted text begin (19)deleted text end new text begin (18)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by firearm, no fee; deleted text begin (20)deleted text end new text begin (19)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by archery, no fee; deleted text begin (21)deleted text end new text begin (20)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, no fee; and deleted text begin (22)deleted text end new text begin (21)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take bear, no fee. (b) A $5 surcharge shall be added to nonresident hunting licenses issued under paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (6) and (8). An additional commission may not be assessed on this surcharge. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 20, is amended to read: Subd. 20. Trapping licenses. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end The fee for a license to trap fur-bearing animalsdeleted text begin , other than wolves,deleted text end is: (1) for residents over age 13 and under age 18, $5; (2) for residents age 18 or over and under age 65, $23; (3) for residents age 65 or over, $11.50; and (4) for nonresidents, $84. deleted text begin (b) The fee for a license to trap wolves is $30, to be issued to residents only. deleted text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.485, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Licenses to be sold and issuing fees. (a) Persons authorized to sell licenses under this section must issue the following licenses for the license fee and the following issuing fees: (1) to take deer or bear with firearms and by archery, the issuing fee is $1; (2) Minnesota sporting, the issuing fee is $1; (3) to take small game, to take fish by angling or by spearing, and to trap fur-bearing animals, the issuing fee is $1; (4) to apply for a limited hunt drawing, the issuing fee is $1 unless the application requires a license purchase at the time of application and the license purchase requires an application fee; (5) for a prairie-chicken license, the issuing fee is $1; (6) for a turkey license, the issuing fee is $1; (7) for an elk license, the issuing fee is $1; (8) for a moose license, the issuing fee is $1; deleted text begin (9) for a wolf license, the issuing fee is $1; deleted text end deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end for a stamp validation that is not issued simultaneously with a license, an issuing fee of 50 cents may be charged at the discretion of the authorized seller; deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end for stamp validations issued simultaneously with a license, there is no fee; deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end for licenses, seals, tags, or coupons issued without a fee under section 97A.441, subdivisions 1 to 6a, or 97A.465, there is no fee; deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end for lifetime licenses, there is no fee; and deleted text begin (14)deleted text end new text begin (13)new text end for all other licenses, permits, renewals, or applications or any other transaction through the electronic licensing system under this chapter or any other chapter when an issuing fee is not specified, an issuing fee of $1 may be charged at the discretion of the authorized seller. (b) Only one issuing fee may be collected when selling more than one stamp in the same transaction after the end of the season for which the stamp was issued. (c) The agent shall keep the issuing fee as a commission for selling the licenses. (d) The commissioner shall collect the issuing fee on licenses sold by the commissioner. (e) A license, except stamps, must state the amount of the issuing fee and that the issuing fee is kept by the seller as a commission for selling the licenses. (f) For duplicate licenses, including licenses issued without a fee, the issuing fees are: (1) for licenses to take big game, 75 cents; and (2) for other licenses, 50 cents. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.031, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Permissible firearms and ammunition; big game deleted text begin and wolvesdeleted text end . A person may take big game deleted text begin and wolvesdeleted text end with a firearm only if: (1) any rifle, shotgun, or handgun used is a caliber of at least .22 inches and has centerfire ignition; (2) the firearm is loaded only with single projectile ammunition; (3) a projectile used is a caliber of at least .22 inches and has a soft point or is an expanding bullet type; (4) any muzzleloader used has the projectile loaded only at the muzzle; (5) any smooth-bore muzzleloader used is a caliber of at least .45 inches; and (6) any rifled muzzleloader used is a caliber of at least .40 inches. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.031, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Handguns for small game. A person may take small game with a handgun of any caliber in a manner prescribed by the commissionerdeleted text begin , except that wolves may only be taken by hunting with the calibers specified in subdivision 1deleted text end . Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.035, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Minimum draw weight. A bow used to take big gamedeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ornew text end turkeydeleted text begin , or wolvesdeleted text end must have a pull that meets or exceeds 30 pounds at or before full draw. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.075, is amended to read: 97B.075 HUNTING RESTRICTED BETWEEN EVENING AND MORNING. (a) A person may not take protected wild animals, except raccoon and fox, with a firearm between the evening and morning times established by commissioner's rule, except as provided in this section. (b) Big game deleted text begin and wolvesdeleted text end may be taken from one-half hour before sunrise until one-half hour after sunset. (c) Except as otherwise prescribed by the commissioner on or before the Saturday nearest October 8, waterfowl may be taken from one-half hour before sunrise until sunset during the entire season prescribed by the commissioner. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.601, subdivision 3a, is amended to read: Subd. 3a. Nonresidents; trapping small game. A nonresident may take small gamedeleted text begin , except wolves,deleted text end by trapping only on land owned by the nonresident, if the nonresident possesses a trapping license for fur-bearing animals deleted text begin other than wolvesdeleted text end and a small-game license. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.601, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Exception to license requirements. (a) A resident under age 16 may take small gamedeleted text begin , other than wolves,deleted text end without a small-game license, and a resident under age 13 may trap small game and fur-bearing animalsdeleted text begin , other than wolves,deleted text end without a trapping license, as provided in section 97A.451, subdivision 3. (b) A person may take small gamedeleted text begin , other than wolves,deleted text end without a small-game license on land occupied by the person as a principal residence. (c) An owner or occupant may take certain small game causing damage without a small-game or trapping license as provided in section 97B.655. (d) A person may use dogs to pursue and tree raccoons under section 97B.621, subdivision 2, during the closed season without a license. (e) A person may take a deleted text begin wolf,deleted text end turkeydeleted text begin ,deleted text end or prairie chicken without a small-game license. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.603, is amended to read: 97B.603 TAKING SMALL GAME BY PARTY. (a) While two or more persons are taking small game as a party and maintaining unaided visual and vocal contact, a member of the party may take and possess more than one limit of small game, but the total number of small game taken and possessed by the party may not exceed the limit of the number of persons in the party that may take and possess small game. (b) This section does not apply to hunting deleted text begin wolves,deleted text end migratory game birdsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end or turkeys, except that a licensed turkey hunter may assist another licensed turkey hunter deleted text begin and a licensed wolf hunter may assist another licensed wolf hunterdeleted text end for the same zone and time period as long as the hunter does not shoot or register a turkey deleted text begin or wolfdeleted text end for the other hunter. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.605, is amended to read: 97B.605 COMMISSIONER MAY RESTRICT TAKING SMALL GAME ANIMALS. The commissioner may by rule set open seasons for, prescribe limits and restrictions on, and designate areas where small game as defined in section 97A.015new text begin , excluding wolves,new text end may be taken and possessed. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.645, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. new text begin No new text end open season. There deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end no open season for wolves deleted text begin until after the wolf is delisted under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973. After that time, the commissioner may prescribe open seasons and restrictions for taking wolves but must provide opportunity for public commentdeleted text end . Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.648, is amended to read: 97B.648 WOLVES; UNLAWFUL TAKING; PENALTY. A person who unlawfully takes, transports, or possesses a wolf in violation of the game and fish lawsdeleted text begin , and has one or more prior convictions involving the taking of wolvesdeleted text end new text begin is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and, in addition to the penalties prescribed in section 97A.301, subdivision 2new text end , is liable for a civil penalty equal to the restitution value for the wolf. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.901, is amended to read: 97B.901 REGISTRATION AND TAGGING FUR-BEARING ANIMALS. (a) The commissioner may, by rule, require persons taking, possessing, and transporting fur-bearing animals to tag the animals. The commissioner shall prescribe the manner of issuance and the type of tag, which must show the year of issuance. The commissioner shall issue the tag, without a fee, upon request. (b) The pelt of each bobcat, fisher, pine marten,new text begin andnew text end otterdeleted text begin , and wolfdeleted text end must be presented, by the person taking it, to a state wildlife manager designee for registration before the pelt is sold and before the pelt is transported out of the state, but in no event more than 48 hours after the season closes for the species. deleted text begin (c) The whole carcass of each wolf, with the pelt removed, must be presented by the person taking it to a state wildlife manager designee for registration before the pelt is sold and before the pelt is transported out of the state, but in no event more than 48 hours after the season closes. The commissioner may require that the entire carcass or samples from the carcass be surrendered to the state wildlife manager designee. deleted text end Sec. 22. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must correct cross-references wherever they occur in statute consistent with the renumbering in this act. new text end Sec. 23. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.647, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-08194 97B.647 TAKING WOLVES. Subdivision 1. License required. Except as provided under section 97B.645 or 97B.671, a person may not take a wolf without a wolf-hunting or wolf-trapping license. Subd. 2. Open seasons. Wolves may be taken with legal firearms, with bow and arrow, and by trapping. The open season to take wolves with firearms begins each year on the same day as the opening of the firearms deer-hunting season. The commissioner may by rule prescribe the open seasons for wolves according to this subdivision. Subd. 3. Open areas. The commissioner may by rule designate areas where wolves may be taken. Subd. 4. Daily and possession limits. The commissioner may establish by rule the daily and possession limits for wolves. Subd. 5. Limit on number of hunters and trappers. The commissioner may by rule limit the number of persons that may hunt or trap wolves in an area, if it is necessary to prevent an overharvest or improve the distribution of hunters and trappers. The commissioner shall establish a method, including a drawing, to impartially select the hunters and trappers for an area. Subd. 6. Application for license. An application for a wolf-hunting or wolf-trapping license must be made in a manner provided by the commissioner and accompanied by a $4 application fee and proof that the applicant holds a current or previous year hunting license. The $4 application fee shall be credited to the wolf management and monitoring account and appropriated to the commissioner to pay for costs associated with conducting the wolf license drawing and wolf management. A person may not make more than one application for each season as prescribed by the commissioner. If a person makes more than one application, the person is ineligible for a license for that season after determination by the commissioner, without a hearing. Subd. 7. Quotas. The commissioner may by rule set an annual quota for the number of wolves that can be taken by hunting and trapping. The commissioner may establish a method to monitor harvest and close the season when the quota is reached. The commissioner shall reserve a portion of the annual quota for the trapping season.